Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-508
Disclosures of other digital assets of deceased user.

Unless the user prohibited disclosure of digital assets or the court directs otherwise, a custodian shall disclose to the personal representative of the estate of a deceased user a catalogue of electronic communications sent or received by the user and digital assets, other than the content of electronic communications, of the user, if the representative gives the custodian:

(1) a written request for disclosure in physical or electronic form;

(2) a certified copy of the death certificate of the user;

(3) a certified copy of the letter of appointment of the representative or a small-estate affidavit or court order; and

(4) if requested by the custodian:

(A) a number, username, address, or other unique subscriber or account identifier assigned by the custodian to identify the user’s account;

(B) evidence linking the account to the user;

(C) an affidavit stating that disclosure of the user’s digital assets is reasonably necessary for administration of the estate; or

(D) a finding by the court that:

(i) the user had a specific account with the custodian, identifiable by the information specified in subdivision (4)(A) of this section; or

(ii) disclosure of the user’s digital assets is reasonably necessary for administration of the estate.

Laws 2016, LB829, § 8.